West Virginia, session 2026, SB348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Municipal Pensions Oversight Board. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 9, 2024, authorized under the authority of §8-22-18a of this code, relating to the Municipal Pensions Oversight Board (exempt purchasing, 211 CSR 02), is authorized.